src-fst-affixes-verbs.lexc.md
*Verbs 63 ä examples:*
* *jäädä:* `jäädä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # stay)

### Monosyllabic verbs with widening diphthong
Widening diphthongs are simplified before past and conditional suffix i's
by removal of first component. 


*Verbs 64 ie examples:*
* *viedä:* `viedä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # take)


*Verbs 64 uo examples:*
* *tuoda:* `tuoda+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # bring)


*Verbs 64 yö examples:*
* *syödä:* `syödä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # eat)

In past and conditional forms of käydä, the glide before suffix is marked
even in normative orthography.


*Verbs 65 examples:*
* *käydä:* `käydä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # visit, go for)

### Verbs with consonant stems

Verbs with momentane derivation are common consonant stems.


*Verbs 66 back examples:*
* *marista:* `marista+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # whine)


*Verbs 66 front examples:*
* *äristä:* `äristä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # arr)



*Verbs 66 front v p examples:*
* *häväistä:* `häväistä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # sacrilege)


*Verbs 66 back v~p examples:*
* *vavista:* `vavista+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # shake)



*Verbs 66 back k~g examples:*
* *rangaista:* `rangaista+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # punish)

### Verbs with n, r, l, s stems
Notably, the a infinitive forms d assimilates to preceding consonant.


*Verbs 67 back r examples:*
* *surra:* `surra+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # meh)




*Verbs 67 front r examples:*
* *pierrä:* `pierrä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # fart)


*Verbs 67 back n examples:*
* *panna:* `panna+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # put)


*Verbs 67 front n examples:*
* *mennä:* `mennä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # go)

Frequentative derivations are most common source of l stemmed verbs.


*Verbs 67 back l examples:*
* *vastailla:* `vastailla+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # answer)


*Verbs 67 frot l examples:*
* *äksyillä:* `äksyillä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat`


*Verbs 67 front l 0k examples:*
* *leikellä:* `leikellä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # cut)


*Verbs 67 back l 0k examples:*
* *nakella:* `nakella+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # throw)


*Verbs 67 back l 0p examples:*
* *tapella:* `tapella+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # fight)


*Verbs 67 front l 0p examples:*
* *hypellä:* `hypellä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # jump)


*Verbs 67 back l 0t examples:*
* *sulatella:* `sulatella+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # melt)


*Verbs 67 front l 0t examples:*
* *herätellä:* `herätellä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # wake)


*Verbs 67 back l d~t examples:*
* *tipahdella:* `tipahdella+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # drop)


*Verbs 67 front l d~t examples:*
* *säpsähdellä:* `säpsähdellä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # wake)


*Verbs 67 back l m~p examples:*
* *ommella:* `ommella+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # sow)


*Verbs 67 back l l~t examples:*
* *vaellella:* `vaellella+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # wander)


*Verbs 67 frpnt l l~t examples:*
* *kiillellä:* `kiillellä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # sparkle)


*Verbs 67 back l n~t examples:*
* *komennella:* `komennella+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # boss)


*Verbs 67 front l n~t examples:*
* *käännellä:* `käännellä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # turn)


*Verbs 67 back l r~t examples:*
* *nakerrella:* `nakerrella+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # bite)


*Verbs 67 front l r~t examples:*
* *kiherrellä:* `kiherrellä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # giggle)

### tse stuff
Some verbs have possible optional heteroclitic indicative stems:


*Verbs 68 front examples:*
* *isännöidä:* `isännöidä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # host)


*Verbs 68 back examples:*
* *mellakoida:* `mellakoida+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # riot)

In these stems the tse formed stem is only one.


*Verbs 69 back examples:*
* *palkita:* `palkita+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # reward)


*Verbs 69 front examples:*
* *merkitä:* `merkitä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # mark)

Few words have special consonant cluster simplification for ks forms.


*Verbs 70 back examples:*
* *juosta:* `juosta+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # run)


*Verbs 70 front examples:*
* *piestä:* `piestä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # spank)


nähdä has special h:k variation.


*Verbs 71 examples:*
* *nähdä:* `nähdä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # see)

### Verbs with -ne- stems


*Verbs 72 back examples:*
* *karheta:* `karheta+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat`


*Verbs 72 rfont examples:*
* *vähetä:* `vähetä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # lessen)


*Verbs 72 back 0~k examples:*
* *niuketa:* `niuketa+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # tighten)


*Verbs 72 front 0~k examples:*
* *jyrketä:* `jyrketä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat`


*Verbs 72 back 0~p examples:*
* *hapata:* `hapata+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # ensour)


*Verbs 72 front 0~p examples:*
* *supeta:* `supeta+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # tighten)


*Verbs 72 front 0~p examples:*
* *tylpetä:* `tylpetä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # dull)


*Verbs 72 back 0~p o examples:*
* *helpota:* `helpota+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # ease)


*Verbs 72 back 0~t examples:*
* *loitota:* `loitota+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # distance)


*Verbs 72 back 0~k o examples:*
* *ulota:* `ulota+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # outen)


*Verbs 72 back v~p examples:*
* *kaveta:* `kaveta+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # tighten)


*Verbs 72 front d~t examples:*
* *mädätä:* `mädätä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # rot)


*Verbs 72 back d~t examples:*
* *leudota:* `leudota+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat`


*Verbs 72 front d~t e examples:*
* *pidetä:* `pidetä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # lengthen)


*Verbs 72 front m~p  examples:*
* *lämmetä:* `lämmetä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # warm)


*Verbs 72 front n~t examples:*
* *kiinnetä:* `kiinnetä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # firm)


*Verbs 72 back j~k examples:*
* *juljeta:* `juljeta+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # dare)

### Vowel lengthening(?) stems


*Verbs 73 back examples:*
* *arvata:* `arvata+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # guess)


*Verbs 73 front examples:*
* *ynnätä:* `ynnätä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # add)


*Verbs 73 back 0~k examples:*
* *morkata:* `morkata+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # blame)


*Verbs 73 front 0~k examples:*
* *yökätä:* `yökätä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # yuck)


*Verbs 73 back 0~p examples:*
* *siepata:* `siepata+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # kidnap)


*Verbs 73 frot 0~p examples:*
* *välpätä:* `välpätä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat`


*Verbs 73 back 0~t examples:*
* *luntata:* `luntata+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # cheat)


*Verbs 73 front 0~t examples:*
* *läntätä:* `läntätä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # splat)


*Verbs 73 back v~p examples:*
* *kaivata:* `kaivata+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # long)


*Verbs 73 front v~p examples:*
* *levätä:* `levätä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # rest)


*Verbs 73 back d~r examples:*
* *jahdata:* `jahdata+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # hunt)


*Verbs 73 front d~t examples:*
* *tähdätä:* `tähdätä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # aim)


*Verbs 73 back g~k examples:*
* *vongata:* `vongata+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # beg)




*Verbs 73 front g~k examples:*
* *vängätä:* `vängätä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # argue)


*Verbs 73 back m~p examples:*
* *temmata:* `temmata+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # pull)


*Verbs 73 back l~t examples:*
* *mullata:* `mullata+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # dirt)


*Verbs 73 back n~t examples:*
* *suunnata:* `suunnata+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # go)


*Verbs 73 front n~t examples:*
* *rynnätä:* `rynnätä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # rush)


*Verbs 73 back r~t examples:*
* *virrata:* `virrata+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # stream)


*Verbs 73 front j~k examples:*
* *hyljätä:* `hyljätä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # abandon)


*Verbs 73 back 0~g examples:*
* *digata:* `digata+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # dig)


*Verbs 73 back 0~b examples:*
* *lobata:* `lobata+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # lobby)


*Verbs 74 back  examples:*
* *karhuta:* `karhuta+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # tax)


*Verbs 74 front  examples:*
* *tähytä:* `tähytä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # periscope)


*Verbs 74 back 0~k  examples:*
* *kaikota:* `kaikota+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # disappear)


*Verbs 74 back 0~k e  examples:*
* *poiketa:* `poiketa+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat`


*Verbs 74 front 0~k e  examples:*
* *keretä:* `keretä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat`


*Verbs 74 front   0~k u  examples:*
* *koukuta:* `koukuta+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # hook)


*Verbs 74 back 0~p  examples:*
* *pulputa:* `pulputa+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # pulp)


*Verbs 74 back 0~p o  examples:*
* *upota:* `upota+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # sink)


*Verbs 74 back 0~to examples:*
* *lotota:* `lotota+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # lotto)


*Verbs 74 back 0~tu examples:*
* *luututa:* `luututa+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # mop)


*Verbs 74 back v~p  examples:*
* *kivuta:* `kivuta+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # climb)


*Verbs 74 back v~pe examples:*
* *korveta:* `korveta+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat`


*Verbs 74 front v~pe examples:*
* *kiivetä:* `kiivetä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # climb)


*Verbs 74 back v~po examples:*
* *kirvota:* `kirvota+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # loose)


*Verbs 74 back d~t  examples:*
* *kadota:* `kadota+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # disappear)


*Verbs 74 back t~de examples:*
* *todeta:* `todeta+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # note)


*Verbs 74 front t~de examples:*
* *vyyhdetä:* `vyyhdetä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # entangle)


*Verbs 74 back d~tu examples:*
* *liiduta:* `liiduta+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # chalk)


*Verbs 74 back g~ke examples:*
* *tungeta:* `tungeta+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # push)


*Verbs 74 back g~ko examples:*
* *pingota:* `pingota+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # ping)


*Verbs 74 front g~ke  examples:*
* *ängetä:* `ängetä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # push)


*Verbs 74 back m~p  examples:*
* *kummuta:* `kummuta+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat`


*Verbs 74 back p~mu examples:*
* *kammeta:* `kammeta+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # lever)


*Verbs 74 back p~mu examples:*
* *sammota:* `sammota+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat`


*Verbs 74 back t~no examples:*
* *innota:* `innota+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # eager)


*Verbs 74 back t~to examples:*
* *irrota:* `irrota+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # tear)


*Verbs 74 back j~ke examples:*
* *haljeta:* `haljeta+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # split)


*Verbs 74 front j~k  examples:*
* *iljetä:* `iljetä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # dare)


*Verbs 75 front examples:*
* *myrskytä:* `myrskytä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # storm)


*Verbs 75 back examples:*
* *lassota:* `lassota+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # lasso)


*Verbs 75 itä examples:*
* *selvitä:* `selvitä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # manage)


*Verbs 75 pytä examples:*
* *ryöpytä:* `ryöpytä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # flood)


*Verbs 75 tota examples:*
* *peitota:* `peitota+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # beat)


*Verbs 75 itä examples:*
* *keritä:* `keritä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat`


*Verbs 75 dota examples:*
* *muodota:* `muodota+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # form)


*Verbs 75 mitä examples:*
* *lämmitä:* `lämmitä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # heat)


*Verbs 75 lota examples:*
* *aallota:* `aallota+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # wave)


*Verbs 75 litä examples:*
* *hellitä:* `hellitä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # loose)

### Vowel stems with t:s variation


*Verbs 76 back examples:*
* *taitaa:* `taitaa+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # can)


*Verbs 76 front examples:*
* *tietää:* `tietää+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # know)

### Verbs with defective paradigms
For some verbs, the normative inflection does not allow full set of forms:


*Verbs 77 back  examples:*
* *vipajaa:* `vipajaa+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # thump)


*Verbs 77 front examples:*
* *heläjää:* `heläjää+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # chime)


*Verbs 78 back examples:*
* *raikaa:* `raikaa+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # baum)


*Verbs 78 front examples:*
* *ähkää:* `ähkää+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # meh)

### Verbs with exceptional inflection patterns
There is a handful of verbs that does not fit to the patterns of old
dictionaries.

The verb olla has very peculiar and heteroclitic inflection with lot of
common short forms in standard spoken Finnish:

*Verb olla examples:*
* *olla:* `olla+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # be)
* *lienen:* `olla+V+Act+Pot+Sg1`
* *lie:* `olla+V+Act+Pot+ConNeg`
* *olija:* `olla+V+Der/ja+Sg+Nom`
